 He added, there are now four-month-old diabetic mice that are cured.
 Professor Ehud Ur, a diabetes researcher at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Canada, warned the study is still in its early days.
 Like other experts, he is sceptical about the treatment of diabetes, and he points out that these results are not relevant to people with type one diabetes.
 Monday, the Swedish Academy's permanent Secretary, Sara Danius,
 Danius, however, is now doing nothing, having called his closest collaborator,
 Jamie Siminoff, the Ceo of Ring, says he started the company when he couldn't hear his shop's doorbell.
 He made a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff says that in 2013, after appearing on the show,
 At the end of 2017, Simonyan appeared on the shopping television channel, QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with ADT, a competing security company.
 One experimental vaccine seems to reduce the Ebola death rate, but so far no drug has been clearly proven to treat an existing infection.
 The antibody cocktail ZMapp, which showed promise early on,
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning scientists used it as a benchmark and compared it to the other three treatments.
 The USA Gymnastics board has supported the letter from the U S . Olympic Committee, and we recognize the absolute need for Olympic-Related personnel to help ensure a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's assertion that meaningful change within the organization is preferable to a withdrawal.
 The usa gymnastics board has said it supports an independent review into how the allegations were handled.
 The U S . gymnastics team and the U S . Olympic Committee have the same goal,
 Throughout the nineteen sixty s, Brezinski worked as a consultant to the Kennedy and Lyndon Johnson administrations.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy and served as National Security Advisor to President Henry Kissinger from 1977 to 1981.
 As the head of the NSA, he oversaw the 1978 Camp David summit, the late 1970s Iranian revolution, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone starred in this film, which was nominated in all the major categories.
 Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone were both nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 The other nominations are best picture, best director, best editing, best costume design, best original score, best production design, best sound editing, and best sound mixing.
 In the film, two songs, Audition and City of stars, were nominated for best original song.
 Donald Trump announced that the U S . would be pulling out of Syria.
 This announcement came after Trump had a phone call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey also has refused to return captured ISIS fighters to their home countries.
 This confirms, at least, that some dinosaurs had feathers,
 Scientists have revealed that the top of the feather was a deep purple, while the underside was a pale green or yellow.
 Such a finding also offers insights into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 But the feathers, although they are not as well developed as the quill,
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but for thermoregulation and display.
 This is the tail of a young dinosaur, but you can see from the sample that it is not a juvenile's downy coat,
 The police station in Gaziantep, Turkey, was bombed yesterday morning by a car bomb.
 The governor said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 The police say they are investigating the ISIL armed group as being responsible for the attack.
 They found that the sun's light and rotation were the only principles that governed it.
 They use both the light and rotation to determine a star's Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less the star's activity is correlated with its magnetic field.
 During his travels, Iwasaki encountered several obstacles.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by mad dogs, nearly married in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both the 2.4 GHz and 5.0 GHz frequencies.
 If there's a double radio in the base station, this will allow 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g to be backwards compatible.
 802.11n is a theoretical maximum of 600 Mbit/s, which is significantly faster than the older standards.
 Hershey and Chase used phages, or viruses, to implant their own DNA into a bacterium.
 Miller said he was not prepared to hear what Miller had to say during the hearing.
 And Xi Jinping said, quote, we will strive to reduce carbon dioxide emissions per unit of GDP by a significant margin.
 He did not give a figure, but said the amount would be based on China's economic output.
 And he encouraged developing countries to move away from the old way of just polluting and then cleaning up.
 And he said, quote, unquote, that the development of the brain is not a fixed state,
 The Iraqi study group issued its report today at 12 GMT.
 At this point, it is unclear whether Iraq's actions will increase sectarian violence or chaos.
 The report begins with a public discussion and a call for consensus on U S . policy in the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of the administration's current Iraq policy in almost every respect, and calls for an immediate course correction.
 One of the first recommendations is to reassert our diplomatic presence in the region.
 The current Senate leader and Argentina's first lady, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy yesterday in La Plata, 50 kilometres from Buenos Aires.
 Kirchnerer started her campaign for the presidency at the same place, the Argentine theatre.
 After the Katrina hurricane, spending on relief and reconstruction,
 Liberal criticism of the rebuilding effort focused on what were called the Washington insiders.
 More than four hundred thousand people came to Rome for the funeral.
 The number of people present was so great that most of them could not enter the funeral procession in St . Peter's square.
 Several large television screens were set up in various parts of the city to allow people to watch the funeral.
 In many Italian cities and in other cities around the world, especially in Poland, similar screens have been set up to allow many people to watch.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's policy of focusing on easy cases, such as stolen vehicles,
 The U S . Congress allocated funds for the anti-pornography effort starting in the 2005 budget, and the FBI specifically mandated that it would have at least ten agents in the adult pornography field.
 Robin Uthappa scored the innings highest point with 41 runs in 4 overs.
 In the middle order, Kirsten Dhaliwal and Rahul Dravid scored a fine partnership of 100 runs.
 But India lost seven wickets to end the innings, scoring only 36 runs.
 George W . Bush, the President of the United States, arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long Asian tour.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's deputy Prime Minister, Wong Kan Seng, and discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore's Prime Minister, Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush, after a week of defeats in the midterm elections, announced a trade expansion policy in Asia.
 Stephen Harper, the Prime Minister, ended a 25-minute meeting with NDP leader Jack Layton,
 Layton said in a press conference that day,
 The Commonwealth government has been accused of using the money to buy votes in the November Federal election.
 But the Prime Minister, John Howard, said the move was to prevent the Tasmanian government from downgrading hospital facilities.
 Recently, a tsunami alert was issued,
 In Tonga, though, no major damage or injuries were reported, but power outages were temporarily cut off, and the Tongan authorities were unable to receive a tsunami warning from PTWC.
 Fourteen Hawaii-Based schools,
 George W . Bush, the U S . President, welcomed the announcement.
 Gordon Johnson, a spokesman for Bush, said,
 The tenth hurricane of the Atlantic hurricane season,
 According to the National Hurricane center,
 The U S . Army Corps of engineers estimated that a six inch per hour rainfall would overwhelm the damaged levees.
 In the Ninth Ward, which experienced a twenty-foot flood during Hurricane Katrina,
 Beyond the 100-foot levee, the water rushes.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his dissatisfaction with the deletion in a phone call to Wikinews last month.
 First, he lied to us, saying it was all because of a legal reason,
 Recently, a joint community backlash has arisen to try to write a policy statement regarding the site's sexual content.
 But although it relies mostly on theory, the program is designed to simulate the observations of the Andromeda Galaxy.
 The team was looking for the effect of the cosmic web on the cosmic web.
 As the moon pulls on the earth, so the Galaxy pulls on the Cygnus Galaxy.
 Scientists have concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as it does ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, most of the dark matter around galaxies is in the form of a halo,
 The TV news footage shows white smoke coming out of the factory.
 The local authorities have warned residents to stay indoors and turn off their air conditioning.
 According to Japanese government agencies, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 Authorities say this indicates that a container holding uranium fuel at the site has ruptured and is leaking.
 Dr Tony Muller discovered XDR-TB in the South African region of Kwazulu-Natal.
 He said in the interview that the new variant is 'very, very difficult to deal with',
 Moll thinks some of the patients may have been infected at the hospital,
 Over a year, one infected person can infect 10 to 15 other people.
 But the overall proportion of XDR-TB among all TB patients is not that high.
 Weighing over 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour,
 Scientists say the explosion was huge.
 They're still working on the size of the impact and what the earth will be affected by.
 The Pentagon's strategic command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the analysis will be published on a public Website.
 The mother of a Pittsburgh-Area pediatrician who was found dead in the back of his car Tuesday has been charged with aggravated murder.
 Dr . Malala Valsubramani, a 29-year-old from Cincinnati, was found unconscious and wearing only a T-shirt and underwear.
 She pointed to a black and white Olsen intriguer, which was about 150 meters away.
 There, they found the body of 53-year-old Saroja Balasubramanian, covered in a blood-soaked sheet.
 The police say the body had been there for a day.
 The first case of the season was reported in late July.
 The virus is then transmitted to humans via mosquitoes.
 The Indian government has sent pig hunters to the affected areas,
 The government has promised to deliver hundreds of millions of polio vaccines,
 This year, the plan to deliver vaccines to the hardest-hit areas has been delayed due to a lack of funds and other competing priorities.
 Slavinia moved to Sweden in 1956, and three years later, he began working at the Swedish post office as a chief sculptor.
 He has created over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 His work is highly regarded for its quality and detail, and he is one of the few whose name is known to almost everyone.
 His 1,000th stamp was a gigantic work by David Klutzner, entitled the Swedish Kings of the past.
 He has also been involved in the design of other countries' banknotes, such as the new five and ten Canadian dollars.
 After the incident, Gibson was rushed to the hospital, where he died a short time later.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the collision.
 The vehicle was then transported to the crash site at approximately twelve o'clock that same day,
 One worker at a nearby repair shop said,
 They all rushed to the scene of the accident.
 Other themes include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in ways that are less polluting.
 The UN also hopes to complete the raising of a fund to help the world's poorest countries deal with the effects of global warming.
 That money could go to flood-proofing, water management, and crop diversity.
 Fluke wrote that women's health advocates had just been wasted.
 She urged that the pill should be regarded as a medical necessity for women and men alike.
 As the injured were being transported to the hospital, and the fight was stopped, about forty inmates stood their ground and refused to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to fix the situation, but the prisoners' demands were unclear.
 Between 10 and 11 am MDT, inmates started a fire in the prison yard.
 Soon, riot control police entered the yard, using tear gas to corner the inmates.
 The firefighters finally extinguished the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 Since the dam was built in 1963, the seasonal flooding of the river has been reduced.
 This sediment is essential for creating sandbars and beaches that are used for wildlife habitat.
 As a result, two species of fish were wiped out, and two others, including the humpback whale, are now endangered.
 The flood will raise the water a few feet, but officials are hoping it will help repair the eroded sandbar.
 The tsunami warning was not issued, and according to the Jakarta Geophysics Institute, a tsunami warning would not be issued for an earthquake of less than 6.5 on the Richter scale.
 Despite the lack of tsunami warning, residents began to panic and evacuate their businesses and homes.
 Although Winifred wept in her farewell, she promised the fans that she would be back.
 And this is not a farewell,
 As a result, Namibia's President and Parliament were re-elected.
 The ruling SWAPO party also retained its majority in the National Assembly.
 The allies and Afghan forces entered the area and secured it, while other allied aircraft were also sent to support.
 The collision occurred at a high elevation, and is thought to have been caused by an unexpected fire.
 The search for the crash site is hampered by bad weather and rugged terrain.
 Medical aid group Mangola, Doctors without Borders, and the World Health Organisation say this outbreak is the worst the country has ever seen.
 And the West found itself cut off from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 The weather was perfect for the Rugby, with only a slight drizzle in the morning.
 The top seed of the tournament, South Africa, made a comfortable start, beating Zambia, the fifth seed, 26-0.
 In the matches against the Southern Hemisphere, South Africa looked completely out of their depth,
 Well-Trained defense skills, ball handling skills and a great teamwork made it obvious to everyone that the team would win.
 The Amsterdam city council and the Anne Frank House claim the tree is infected with fungus and is in danger of falling, posing a public health risk.
 It was scheduled to be torn down on Tuesday,
 All of the caves with the name seven sisters are at least one hundred to two hundred and fifty metres in diameter.
 The infrared photos show the temperature change between day and night, which could indicate the presence of a cave.
 They are cooler in the daytime and warmer at night.
 The pyramid sound and light show is one of the most interesting things in the area for kids.
 In France, voting is traditionally a low-level experience, voters are isolated in booths, and they put their pre-printed paper ballot into an envelope.
 The staff then verify the voter's identity,
 French election law, on the other hand, is rigorously codified.
 From 1988 onwards, the ballot box was made to be transparent so that voters and supervisors could see that no other envelope was put inside.
 The candidate may send a representative to observe the entire process.
 The Eee PC, which was launched worldwide for cost-cutting and functionality, became a hot topic at the Taipei IT Month in 2007.
 But Asus won the Taiwanese government's 2007 sustainability award from Taiwan's environment minister, Yang Mei-Hwa.
 The station's Website describes the show as, quote,
 Initially, the show focused on talk radio and was hosted exclusively on TogiNet Radio.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary broadcasting station.
 The show originally featured local amateurs from the East Texas area.
 The city of Bishkek, however, remained largely untouched.
 One eyewitness described the scene as people were roaming the streets and looting goods,
 Some of the Bishkek residents blamed the South of the country protesters for illegal lawlessness.
 South Africa won the Rugby Union Tri-Nations match against the All-Blacks of New Zealand.
 The final score was 21 to 20, with the All Blacks winning their 15th straight.
 In the spring of two thousand and eight,
 It was the All-Blacks' final before the Rugby World Cup.
 The final game of the series will be played next week at Ellis Park in Johannesburg.
 Monday at 10:08 p.m. Eastern time,
 The us Geological survey and the National earthquake information center reported no immediate damage.
 The epicenter of the quake was about 20 kilometers northeast of Dillon and about 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 A deadly avian flu variant, H5N1, was found in a dead wild duck on Monday in a marsh near Lyon, in eastern France.
 France is the seventh European country to be hit by the virus.
 In Croatia and Denmark, cases suspected of being H5N1 remain unconfirmed.
 Chamber's widely quoted statement is,
 The atheist Chambers said the lawsuit was ""trivial"" and anyone could have sued.
 Camille Saint-Saens, in an opera he wrote called the Carnival of the Animals,
 As a result, performers on stage are now encouraged to smoke marijuana cigarettes and to encourage audience participation.
 Newt Gingrich, Rick Perry, and Michelle Bachmann,
 Gingrich praised Santorum after the results were in, but he also made some harsh comments about Romney.
 Perry returned to Texas to evaluate the results of the convention and later said he would remain in the race.
 Bachmann ended her campaign in August.
 The photographer was transported to Ronald Reagan UCLA medical center, where he later died.
 And the new competitors are different, so the new population will need different features or adaptations to be a strong competitor than what they had needed before.
 The entertainment news Website TMZ posted a photo of the car parked across the street,
 According to police, the driver of the car that hit the photographer is unlikely to face criminal charges.
 Because only eight medals are given out per day, many countries have not won a medal on the podium.
 Yesterday, in the super G, Anna Jochemsen of the Netherlands and Katja Saarinen of Finland,
 Mitchell Goliath of Australia finished in eleventh place, while Czech competitor, Oldrich Zelynicky, finished in sixteenth place.
 In the men's super-heavyweight, Ali Belasquez of Mexico finished in 15th place, while New Zealand's Adam Hol was 9th in the men's super-heavyweight.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished in 13th place in the men's Super-G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are facing criticism for the spread of disease near their base camp.
 According to the lawsuit, UN camp waste was not properly disinfected, and bacteria from the UN camp washed into the Artibonite River,
 Before the military, Haiti had never had a problem with disease.
 The Iwf Institute for justice and democracy in Nepal cited an independent study which said Nepal's UN peacekeepers had inadvertently spread the disease to Haiti.
 The U.N. disease expert, Daniel Lantrang, said this rapid increase is likely to have been caused by peacekeepers.
 Mr . Hamilton confirmed that Howard University hospital had admitted a stable patient.
 The patient had visited Nigeria, where the Ebola virus outbreak had occurred.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines to keep patients isolated from other people.
 Before the Simpsons, Simon had worked in a variety of different roles.
 In the eighty s, he worked on taxi, cheers, and the Waltons.
 In 1989, he helped Brooks and Groening with the production of the Simpsons,
 Although he left the show in 1993, he has retained the title of executive producer and continues to receive millions of dollars in royalties every season.
 The Chinese news agency, Xinhua, had earlier reported that the plane was being hijacked.
 According to subsequent reports, the airliner had been the target of a bombing.
 According to early reports, the plane was diverted to Afghanistan after refusing to land in Yurmanki.
 Iran has a history of frequent aviation accidents, both civilian and military, due to poorly maintained and outdated aircraft.
 International sanctions meant that the new aircraft could not be purchased.
 This week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, a flight from Iran to Armenia crashed, killing 168 people, the worst air disaster in years.
 In the same month, another passenger plane crashed into a wall at Mashad Airport, killing seventeen.
 Airbus canceled the remaining concerts of the tour.
 The band had planned to tour the United States and Canada until September sixteenth.
 The lead vocalist, Steven Tyler, had to cancel a tour after he fell off the stage during a concert on August 5.
 Murray won the first set, breaking serve to level the match.
 Del Portillo won the first set, but a tie-break was needed to decide the second.
 Portland is currently rehabbing his shoulder, but he's expected to be back in the lineup sometime this week.
 This program began at eight thirty PM local time,
 Famous singers from all over India sang the religious hymn, Shri Shyam, in front of Shri Shyam's feet.
 Singer Shaan Sharma started the evening, followed by Jai Shankar and then by singer Rajesh Kannan.
 And, in addition, Lakshmi Singh led the way in singing the Bajans.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog were laid out for Baba Shyam.
 Latak Singh also performed Chhapar Mali,
 The announcement was made at a press conference on Thursday.
 The Controller, which is similar in shape to a television remote, uses two sensors located near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 And so, by doing this, players can control the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella started the race from pole position, but lost control of his car early on.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso, who had been leading most of the race, had to retire shortly after.
 Michael Schumacher finished the race in second place, due to suspension damage.
 According to the recording, Liu said, quote, she's very cute and she sings pretty well.
 I've been deeply moved every time I've rehearsed this piece.
 About three minutes after launch, a very large amount of thermal insulation foam was seen to be falling away from the fuel tank.
 But these are not thought to have caused the damage to the shuttle.
 The NASA space shuttle program's chief of mission, N . Wayne Hale Jr, said the insulation fell off during a period we were concerned about.
 Suddenly, about five minutes into the fireworks, the wind started to pick up, and then, about a minute later, it was like,
 And I'm going to show you a couple of these, and then we'll go to the next slide.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture is operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Company reported that the earthquake had no impact on its Shika nuclear power plant,
 The 9,400 households in the area reportedly live without water and about 100 households reportedly live without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, and railroad service was suspended in the affected areas, including Noto Airport in Ishikawa Prefecture.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Two more bombs went off in the vicinity of the government building two hours later.
 The official death toll is eight, according to some reports, with up to thirty injured.
 And the normal economy fare for business, and eleven times for first class.
 The two compounds reacted with each other to form a crystal, which the researchers said could block the function of the kidney.
 The researchers found that adding melanin and cynarin to the cat's urine caused the crystals to form.
 The composition of these crystals is consistent with the crystals found in the urine of the affected pet.
 As you may or may not know, most of the goods that come from Central America are duty-free.
 Although eighty percent of our goods are taxed through customs, we treat you.
 That just didn't seem fair to me.
 The words I'm about to say are the same words I've used to describe you.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, signed a bill into law that bans the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 This law requires that violent Video games sold in California be labeled with a ""18"" label,
 The Attorney General, Keir Starmer, and the CPS director, Alison Saunders, have issued a statement this morning.
 The truck driver, who is aged 64, was not injured in the crash.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear in Westminster magistrates' court on February 16.
 The dead were Nicholas O'Donnell, 25, and Zachary Cuddback, 21, who was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla had a wound on his arm and Kristoffer Schneider had a wound on his face that required reconstructive surgery.
 Uka's weapon missed the fifth man's head, and Schneider suffered from continuous pain, losing one eye, and part of his skull was replaced with titanium.
 Schneider testified via Video link from his home at the usaf base.
 Carpano also competed in two individual races at the championships.
 Her first event, the downhill, she failed to make it past the first gate,
 The other race she ran in, the giant slalom, was 10th, 2 minutes, 11 seconds, 60 behind the winner, Austria's Claudia Rieger,
 Four of the women skiers who had been seated in the women's section did not make it to the finish line, and forty five of the one hundred and seventeen skiers in the overall race were eliminated.
 Madia Pradeep Singh recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phone.
 D K Arya, the deputy Inspector-General of police, said,
 The suspects' names are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandrashekhar Solanki, the investigating officer,
 Three people were in the car, but no one was injured.
 But the driver had a serious head injury.
 The road where the collision occurred was temporarily closed, and the ambulance crew rescued the driver from the red Audi TT vehicle.
 At first he was admitted to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya is currently on trial in the Edinburgh court of law for the murder of his own son.
 She is awaiting trial and has been held in custody, but her reputation is widely known, and her testimony may be biased.
 This is common practice in England, but the Scottish law applies differently, and the court saw the publication of the photograph as potentially harmful.
 As Dundee University's Pamela Ferguson puts it,
 The crown office, which is responsible for the overall prosecution, has indicated to journalists that it will say no more until the trial is over.
 According to the leaked document, the border would be based on the pre-war 1967 borders.
 According to reports, the other topics include the future of the Holy city of Jerusalem and the Jordan Valley.
 Israel, on the other hand, demanded that the current presence of Israeli troops in the zone be extended for ten years,
 Participants in the additional pest control trial were closely supervised by forestry officials.
 NPWS and the Australian sports shooters Association partnered to recruit qualified volunteers for the sports shooters Association's hunting program.
 NPWS acting Park Conservation and Heritage officer Mike O'Brien says the first four shooters selected for the operation were all given comprehensive safety and training direction.
 Martelly took the oath of office yesterday as part of a nine-member provisional electoral council.
 Mattel is the fifth time in four years.
 Last month, the Presidential Commission recommended that the former Ceps resign as part of a new election preparation.
 In October, a broad anti-government protest erupted, and in response, Martelly created the Commission.
 Some of the violence was sparked by the fact that several elections had not been held since 2011.
 About 60 iPod overheating incidents were reported, resulting in 6 total fires and 4 people suffering minor burns.
 The Japanese Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry acknowledged that it had been aware of 27 incidents involving the device.
 Last week, the Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry in Japan reported that apple had reported 34 additional cases.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry, however, expressed regret over the delay.
 The earthquake struck the Mariana Islands at 7:19 a M. local time,
 The North Mariana Islands Department of Homeland Security said no damage was reported at the state level.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a bus in the Philippines' capital, Manila, and took a group of Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Menendez fired an M-16 rifle at tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued, and at least six people were confirmed dead.
 The two children and the elderly woman were released early.
 Later, an elderly woman went to the bathroom, and the photographers took her place.
 And he followed in his father's footsteps,
 He trained as a gynaecologist and began working at the National women's hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 At the hospital, Lee-Guis worked on a study of early labor.
 His research showed that when hormones were administered, the rate of fetal lung maturation increased.
 State-run Xinhua news agency reported that government investigators had retrieved two of the plane's black box recorders on Wednesday.
 Other wrestling peers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tammy Drier was the first manager of the band, and she said, quote,
 The person who was working in the garage near where the accident occurred said,
 In the lead up to the 2010 Federal election, a poll of 1,400 people found that opposition to a change to a Republic had increased by 8% since the 2008 poll.
 Julia Gillard campaigned during the 2010 Federal election campaign that, if elected, she would seek to change the Australian head of state from a Monarch to a President.
 In a poll, thirty four percent said they would like Elizabeth to be the last monarch.
 And through a referendum, 29 per cent of Australians thought that Australia should become a Republic,
 The Olympic gold Medalist had been entered in the one hundred and two hundred yard freestyle,
 The drugs needed to overcome the pain were banned in the Olympics.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at Central Missouri state University, found the largest known prime number as of January twenty fifth.
 Several people had used various hardware and software to confirm the finding, which was announced Tuesday.
 Comets may have been the source of water on earth,
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the earth was formed.
 Cuomo, 53, began his term this year and signed a law last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He referred to it as a political gossip and nonsense.
 He is expected to run for the Presidency in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen will allow planes to fly shorter routes, saving hundreds of millions of gallons of fuel each year and reducing carbon emissions.
 This is in contrast to the ground-based radar technology used previously, which allowed air traffic controllers to identify aircraft with a much higher degree of accuracy.
 At Wembley, additional transport will not be provided or surface trains will not stop, and there will be no surface parking or public transport interchange.
 Concerns about the lack of public transportation have made it likely that the game will be played without fans.
 A study published last Thursday in the journal science announced that a new species of bird has formed in the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 The researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden report that it took a much longer time,
 Gold can be worked into all sorts of shapes, even very small ones.
 It can be drawn as a thin line, it can be bent or twisted, it can be hammered or rolled.
 Gold can be made very thin and can be attached to other metals.
 This is called the pH of a chemical, and it's measured on a scale from zero to fourteen.
 Cabbage juice will change color depending on how much of a chemical it is,
 The pH level is indicated by the amount of hydrogen ions, or H, in a given chemical.
 The hydrogen ion is a positively charged ion,
 Together, they mix the two powders and then add water to the mixture with a clean, wet hand.
 The moisture in your hand reacts with the outer layer and forms a kind of a shell.
 In Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro, almost every house had a sophisticated sewage system and a toilet.
 In the Greek Islands of Santorini and Crete, the ruins of sewage systems have been found.
 In ancient Egypt, Persia, and China, there were also toilets,
 If you're talking to someone thousands of miles away,
 The satellite receives the signal and almost immediately reflects it back.
 The satellite is launched into space by a rocket.
 In order to put a satellite or telescope into space, you need a rocket that is over one hundred feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways, the most obvious being that it has made transportation easier and faster.
 It has brought railroads and automobiles and many other means of transportation.
 Below them are medium-sized animals, such as rabbits, hares, and deer, which are hunted by medium-sized dogs.
 Finally, there are a lot of smaller cats, like insects, rodents, lizards, and birds,
 The key to their success is a concept called niche,
 Lions are the most social of all cats,
 The herd consists of one to three adult males, and as many as thirty adult females and their offspring.
 The female, being in a large family,
 The lion's behavior is similar to that of a lion, although it behaves differently from other large cats.
 The tiger is a versatile athlete and can climb, swim, and jump as far as a human.
 Tigers, lions, tigers, and jaguars are the only four that can roar.
 The roar of the tiger is unlike the roar of the lion, but it is similar to the phrase of a tiger roaring.
 Ocelot prefers to hunt small animals, preferably those that are much smaller than he is, such as monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Osiris is thought to have used his nose to track and then find the prey he was after.
 Owls can see in the dark, and they move very, very carefully.
 Summits include breath-taking views from peaks. Climbers from all parts of the world are continually establishing new routes amongst its endless potential of walls.
 In this new environment, with different resources and competitors, new species will need different traits or adaptations to be able to compete.
 The original population had not changed at all, but still required the same adaptation.
 As time went on and new people began to adapt to the new environment, they started to look a little bit different from the others.
 In the end, after thousands or even millions of years, the two groups will look so different that they can't be called the same species.
 We call this a chemical's pH. You can make an indicator using red cabbage juice.
 Plants make the oxygen we breathe, and humans exhale the carbon dioxide.
 Plants use the sun's energy to make their own food and also provide shade.
 We build our houses out of wood and make our clothes out of plants, most of the food we eat is vegetable,
 Mosasaurus was the apex predator of its time, and so it had no natural enemies.
 The jaws, filled with over seventy very sharp teeth, were added to the under jaw.
 It is not certain, but it is thought that they may have had a beak, and that they ate turtles, large fish, and other mosasaurs,
 This animal would attack anything that entered the water, including the huge dinosaurs.
 Their food, however, was generally familiar to us, although it included such odd and strange things as wild boar, pork, snails, and the winter rat.
 Another difference is that poor people and women sat on chairs, while the rich men preferred to recline on couches.
 The ancient Roman meal could not include foods that were centuries old and had come from Europe to the United States or Asia.
 For example, they ate no corn, tomatoes, potatoes, cocoa, and no ancient Romans ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built a main temple to the city's main deity,
 People would bring offerings to the gods, and priests would try to meet the gods' demands through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and a inner sanctum where only the priests were allowed to enter.
 Sometimes, these are called the pyramids of Giza,
 The top of the tower is a special place for God.
 In the warmth of the Middle East, home was not so important.
 The life of the Hebrews was almost entirely out of doors.
 The girls would cook in the yard, the shops were just street vendors, and the stones were used to build houses.
 There were no great forests in Canaan, so wood was very expensive.
 Erik the Red, according to the Norwegian Saga, was exiled from Iceland for murder,
 Regardless of his discovery, the Eskimo tribe had already been living there at that time.
 Each of these countries belonged to the Scandinavian world, but Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland had many differences in their people, customs, and history.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure,
 But that's not true, even if there's something written on the back of the document.
 The back of the Declaration of Independence reads, in part,
 Nobody knows who wrote it, but the large parchment document, 75.6 cm by 62.2 cm, was rolled up and preserved early.
 So it's likely just a label.
 D-Day and the subsequent battle liberated northern France, but the South remained under German occupation.
 There, under the rule of Vichy France,
 On August 15, the Allies invaded Southern France,
 In just two weeks, the Allied forces had liberated Southern France and were pushing towards Germany.
 Civilization is a very large group of people who work and live together,
 The word civilization, which means civilized, comes from the Latin civitas, meaning city or city state.
 The urban States are the pioneers of civilization, culture, which means the transmission, the preservation and the just distribution of knowledge,
 So a few cultures are lost without meaningful historical evidence,
 During the war, the thirteen colonies formed a united government under the Articles of Confederation,
 Congress had no power to levy taxes, and there was no national executive or judiciary.
 The Congress also had no power to nullify state laws or to impose tariffs.
 These amendments required unanimous consent of all the states, and the central government was ignored by most of the state delegates.
 The Italian football team has been one of the most successful in the world, along with Germany, winning the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, baseball, volleyball, handball, fencing, Rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey, and F1 car racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions, and sometimes Italian athletes compete in international games or the Olympics.
 Japan has almost 7,000 Islands, making it the 7th largest Island in the world.
 And the name of the group is called the Islands of Japan.
 Taiwan was named by the sailors of the fifteenth century as Ilha Formosa, the beautiful Island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company set up a base in the South-Western part of Taiwan,
 In 1683, the Qing dynasty of China took control of Taiwan.
 In 1895, after losing the first Sino-Japanese war,
 Machu Picchu is made up of three main structures, namely, the Intiwatana, the temple of the sun, and three windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edge are reconstructed to better show tourists the original appearance.
 In 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu was restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common still image format in the world, which is 35 mm,
 It's still produced today, but more importantly, it's been adapted to the image sensor format of Digital cameras.
 But it's a little bit confusing, because the 35mm format is actually 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 So the aspect ratio of this format, which is the simplest integer ratio to get, is 3:2.
 Several common formats, such as the APS format, are identical or nearly identical to this aspect ratio.
 The rule of thirds is often used and often derided as a simple rule to maintain the order of an image while creating dynamism.
 This rule positions the main subject at the point where the vertical and horizontal lines intersect.
 This period of European history saw the rise of a wealthy and powerful Catholic Church.
 For over a thousand years, Christianity united the European countries, despite their differences in language and customs.
 The prevalence of it reaches from the King to the peasant.
 According to one of the main teachings of Christianity, wealth is to be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church's currency fund exists specifically for that reason.
 The core power of the church remained in Rome for over a thousand years,
 Immediately after the outbreak of the war, Britain began a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although this blockade violated international law, which was generally accepted at the time,
 Britain had also been accused of mining the high seas to prevent any ship from entering all of its maritime zones.
 The response to this tactic was limited,
 In the nineteen twenty s, the prevailing mood in most of the world was one of pacifism and isolation.
 Through the first World War, nations that had gone through the horrors of the first World War prayed that such a thing would never happen again.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States,
 He arrived in America with a letter of recommendation from Charles Babbage,
 In ancient China, there were different ways of representing each era,
 And there were also many different kingdoms, each with its own ruler,
 During this time, there was a fierce war between many of the nobles who were vying for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms era was one of the most bloody periods in ancient Chinese history, with thousands of people dying to sit in the highest positions of the Weiyuan Palace.
 The transition from absolute monarchy to a Republic,
 After the revolution, jobs were open to all male applicants, and the most ambitious and success-oriented people were able to succeed.
 Instead of a military hierarchy based on rank,
 The French Revolution also inspired other oppressed working-class people to rise up and make their own revolutions.
 The story of the sound and light is just like a story book.
 The caves have withstood the ravages of time and reveal Muhammad's religious inclinations very clearly.
 At the top of one of the mountains north of Mecca, this cave is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, even if you know it exists, it's not easy to find,
 Surrounded by a clear and beautiful sky,
 The journalist's great pyramid is the only one of the seven wonders of the world that still exists.
 Built in the third century BC, the great pyramid was one of many large pyramid structures built to house the dead Pharaoh.
 Giza Plateau, or Giza Necropolis, which is a large complex of several pyramids,
 The great pyramid was built to honor the pharaoh Khufu, and the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor Khufu's wives and family.
 The Olympic symbol is a five-ringed circle.
 The bowstring is pulled from the end of the bow, and the arrow is released from the fletching,
 The OLympics usually have a more subdued opening ceremony,
 You may also draw your own markings with a pencil, but the bow markings are for the purpose of the music,
 The King, Queen, and their two young children, Marie-Therese and Louis-Charles, were forced to flee Paris.
 The King and queen, however, rode in a carriage, surrounded by a mob,
 The crowd forced the King and queen to open the windows of their carriage.
 At one point, a member of the mob waved the head of a beheaded Royalist guard captain in front of the terrified queen.
 The United States used the Philippines as a base for its war against the Spanish.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial government in order to pay for a substantial part of their expenditures,
 Of course, the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people will constitute a basic profit for U S . imperialism.
 To understand the Templar, you have to understand the creation of the order.
 The era in which the incident took place is commonly referred to as the Middle Ages,
 The late Middle Ages, then, are considered to be the period from around the year 1000 to around the year 1500.
 Technological determinism encompasses a broad range of substantive ideas, from the idea that technology is a primary determinant of humanity's fate,
 Most interpretations of technological determinism have two concepts,
 For example, someone might argue that the automobile led to the development of roads.
 But a national road network is economically inefficient, so a new method of production is developed to reduce the cost of car ownership.
 Also, as many people own vehicles, the road accident rate increases, which in turn leads to new technological advancements in the medical field to repair damaged bodies.
 Romanticism had many elements of a cultural determinism,
 In the romantic view, geography formed individuals, and as time went on, the geography-related customs and cultures grew,
 Paris, known as the fashion capital of the modern era,
 The reputation of luxury began around the year 400 and lasted until around the year 1100.
 Constantinople's prestige had fallen in the twelfth century, mainly because the Crusaders brought back goods that were more valuable than the Byzantine silks and spices they had purchased.
 At this time, the fashion capital shifted from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic period lasted from the 10th to the 11th centuries, and peaked in the 14th century.
 In the early days, dress was heavily influenced by Byzantine culture.
 But the information exchange was slow, and so Western styles could be up to 25 to 30 years behind.
 Late medieval Europe began to develop its own style, one of the greatest developments being that people began to use buttons to fasten their clothes.
 Subsistence farming is a form of agriculture where the farmer and his or her family only produce enough food to meet their own needs.
 And it's a system that maximizes the yield of a crop by using local,
 Historically, most farmers have been engaged in subsistence agriculture, and still are in many developing countries.
 A subculture is a group of people who feel alienated from the mainstream and who form their own identity.
 Subcultures can be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, position, and/or gender.
 The defining feature of a Subculture is that it is a distinctive,
 Members of a subculture often identify with a unique and symbolic style, including fashion, manners, and a specific set of slang.
 One of the most common ways of showing the importance of socialization is to use the case of a few unfortunate children who have not been socialized by adults,
 These are called feral children and some of them have been kept in cages by their parents.
 Wild children may have experienced severe childhood trauma or abuse before being abandoned or running away.
 Some children are said to have been raised by animals, and some children are said to have lived in the wild.
 And when it comes to animals, a wild animal raised by humans,
 Project-Based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, and Scratching takes it one step further.
 The scaffolding approach is more like a tutor, using the latest computer programs, for example, or helping someone to learn a new project.
 A virtual and a real world may both be a form of the same thing, which in other words, a teacher is a form of Microsoft office, but a little paper clip human.
 Virtual structures are embedded in the software and are meant to prompt, prompt, prompt,
 The reasons for a child to be placed in foster care range from neglect to abuse, and even to kidnapping.
 All children should grow up in a nurturing, protective, and educational environment.
 We treat the foster care system as a safety zone for these kids.
 Our foster care system will provide a safe home, a nurturing caregiver, stable education, and reliable health care.
 The home-based care must be able to provide all the essential elements that were not being met in the existing home.
 The Internet has both a group and a person-to-person communication element.
 The distinctive nature of the Internet, however, leads to an additional dimension in the use and satisfaction approach.
 Learning and socialization are cited as important motivators for Internet use.
 Aimee and MacDonald (1998) found that personal involvement and continuing relationships were new motivating factors.
 By using Video-Recorded,
 And he argues that this is particularly true of the finer, more subtle,
 Oliver Sacks noted in his book the President's Speech that people were able to accurately perceive the sincerity of the man despite his inability to speak.
 He even suggests that animals like dogs have this ability to analyze human behavior.
 According to twentieth century research, there are two hidden or apparent genetic variation groups.
 Mutation creates a new species of genes, and selection removes the expressed genes from the pool.
 Separation and Recombination shuffles the variations that occur between each generation.
 In the savanna, however, primates with a human-like digestive system are not able to get amino acid needs from the available plant resources.
 And the failure of this can lead to growth hormone deficiency, malnutrition, and eventually death.
 The easiest and most readily available source of protein is leafy greens or legumes, but these are difficult for us to Digest without cooking.
 In contrast, ants, termites, and egg foods are easily digested and provide high-quality protein.
 We're going to look at all of these in a moment, but first, let's consider the protein problem.
 And the normal sleep period is the time that you're intentionally waking up and then you're going to sleep again in a short period of time.
 This will help you to fully wake up and get your day off to a relatively quiet alarm clock.
 If you turn off the alarm clock while you're asleep,
 Other biological rhythm-based options include taking a large amount of water, especially water or diuretics, before bed, and forcing the person to urinate.
 The amount of calmness a person possesses is related to the amount of inner turmoil that is present in his body and mind.
 The less you stress, the more positive energy you will create in your life.
 Anyone can achieve enlightenment, the only obstacle to this goal is our own inner anxiety and negative tendencies.
 Tibetan Buddhism, although based on the teachings of the Buddha,
 Tibetan Buddhism is, in theory, very simple, consisting of Kundalini yoga, meditation, and the path of love that includes everyone.
 Kundalini yoga is a combination of yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantra, and visualization to awaken the Kundalini energy.
 At the heart of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga, which visualizes various deities to cleanse the energy channels, activate the chakras, and create a state of enlightenment.
 In World War II, Germany was a common enemy, and this led to cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States.
 Two years later, the allies had become enemies, and the cold war began.
 The cold war would continue for another forty years and would be a real war fought by proxy armies in Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 On September 17, the Polish defense had already collapsed, and the only hope was to retreat and regroup along the Romanian bridgehead.
 But, in the end, these plans were rendered moot by the Soviet Army's invasion of Polish Eastern territories,
 And so using ships to transport goods is the most efficient way to move a lot of people and a lot of goods across the ocean.
 Traditionally, the Navy's mission has been to transport people and goods, but at the same time, to disrupt the enemy's ability to transport people and goods.
 One of the most notable recent campaigns was the North Atlantic campaign of World War II, in which the United States tried to move manpower and resources across the Atlantic to help Britain.
 At the same time, the German Navy, which relied primarily on U-Boats, tried to prevent this operation.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany would have conquered Britain, as well as the rest of Europe.
 Goat and sheep raising began about one hundred thousand years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to keep them for the sake of milk, wool, meat, and leather.
 The sheep and goats are usually herded in flocks, often by a shepherd,
 The first motorway in Britain was built in the early sixteenth century.
 The cartwheels were made of parallel wooden planks, but they were still a little bit faster than the roads of that time.
 To fix the rails, timber was introduced, but it was found to be less efficient.
 This became a common practice, although iron would wear out wooden wheels faster.
 As time went on, wooden wheels were replaced by iron ones, and in 1767, the first iron railroad was introduced.
 The first known transportation to mankind was walking, and two million years ago, Homo Erectus came into being,
 Their ancestor, Australopithecus, did not habitually walk upright like them.
 Perhaps Sahelanthropus walked on two legs seven million years ago,
 We can start living a more environmentally friendly life,
 In many cases, this is similar to symptomatic treatment, but in order not to be a temporary solution,
 The world has changed a great deal since then, and it's become much more obvious that the world is overpopulated and that our lifestyle is causing a lot of problems.
 On July 4, the Congress adopted it, and then Secretary John Hancock and clerk Charles Thomson signed it and wrote a few lines by hand,
 During the night, one hundred and fifty to two hundred copies were made.
 On July 8, the document was read aloud for the first time by John Nixon in front of the independence hall.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, and he read it to his troops in New York on July 9.
 Yet the twenty-five Dunnlap broadsides that are still known to exist are the oldest surviving copies.
 Today, many paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and are the living descendants of dinosaurs we call them birds.
 Many people do not think of birds as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But still, there are a lot of things that make dinosaurs look like birds.
 They have scales on their feet, lay eggs, and walk on their hind legs like T-Rex.
 Today, most computers use a method of manipulating information through Binary coding.
 Binary numbers can only have two values, namely, a one or a zero, which is why they are called Binary, or bits.
 Internal poisoning may not show symptoms immediately, and symptoms like vomiting are so common that they can't be immediately diagnosed.
 The most obvious sign of a prescription drug or toxic household chemical is a container that's been left open.
 A specific antidote for a specific toxin,
 The term insect is used by entomologists to refer to this kind of insect.
 The term is derived from the word for a parasitic insect, the bedbug, which has been known since ancient times.
 The Cockroach and the Bedbug are both chronic pests, adapting to their host's habitat.
 Multiple sclerosis, the most common neurological disease in young and middle-aged adults, is reported to affect about 400,000 people across the United States.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord, and the nerves that make up the peripheral nervous system.
 Women are two and a half times more likely to get multiple sclerosis than men.
 The couple may decide that it is not in their or the child's best interest to raise a baby.
 These couples may choose to adopt a baby.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents give up their rights to the child.
 The main purpose of science is to understand how the world works, and this is the way most scientific research is done.
 But experimentation is about eliminating one or more hypotheses, about asking questions and about leading to a scientific inquiry.
 Theologians and philosophers focused on the classical texts, especially the Latin Bible.
 Including the science of psychology, Aristotle's view of all substance was accepted.
 As knowledge of Greek declined, the West became disconnected from the roots of Greek philosophy and science.
 Many of the rhythms observed in physiology and behaviour are determined by the existence of an internal clock.
 Bacteria, fungi, plants, and most living organisms, including humans, are found to have a periodic rhythm,
 The biological clock is a self-sustaining oscillator that can continue to tick without any external cues.
 Hershchel and Chase's experiment was one of the leading researches that suggested DNA was a genetic material.
 Huxley and Chase used a virus or a bacterium to insert the DNA.
 When they were exposed to radiation, they found DNA in the cells or protein in the cells.
 Mutations can have a variety of different effects, depending on the type of the mutation, the importance of the affected genetic material, and whether the affected cells are germ cells or somatic cells.
 Mutations in the reproductive cells may only be passed on to the offspring,
 Tourism involving nature includes the scenery of plants and animals,
 Examples of on-site activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, and park and wildlife research.
 A trip to Borneo, a photo, a lesson,
 Every morning, people leave the small town in their cars to go to work, and they pass by the other people who have just left,
 This dynamic transportation shuttle will connect and support all modes of transportation based on the automobile.
 Now, scientific data shows that this huge carbon economy has pushed the biosphere out of its stable state, which helped human evolution for the last two hundred and ten million years.
 Everyone participates in the transportation system, and almost everyone complains about the transportation system.
 In the developed world, we rarely hear about infrastructure problems like bridge collapses.
 Why does the transportation system cause such a grievance, and why does it keep on disappointing us every day?
 Traffic flow is the study of how individual drivers and vehicles move and interact with each other.
 Unfortunately, it is not possible to predict the driver's behavior 100% of the time.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave within a fairly consistent range.
 In order to better represent the flow of traffic, three main characteristics are set up between the three main characteristics.
 These relationships help in the planning, design, and operation of roadways.
 Insects were the first animals to be able to fly in the air,
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back.
 This allows them to have a wider range of smaller places to hide.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings are the moth and the butterfly.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some people, including the old astronomer, believed that he was right,
 It seems as if the earth were not moving,
 The Amazon is the second longest river in the world by length and the first by volume of water it carries.
 The Amazon is also the world's largest river by volume, with a discharge of water that sometimes reaches 6 miles across.
 Twenty percent of the world's fresh water flows into the ocean from the Amazon.
 The Amazon River is the largest in the world, with a length of 6,387 kilometers.
 And the last of the great pyramids was built at Giza,
 The ancient Egyptians admired the pyramids of their ancestors,
 The Vatican city state has a population of about eight hundred.
 The Vatican City State uses Italian for legislation and official communications.
 And Italian, unlike the Latin of religious ceremonies, is the everyday language of most people who work in the city.
 All citizens of the Vatican city state are Roman Catholics.
 People have known about basic chemical elements such as gold, silver, copper, and lead since ancient times,
 Aristotle theorized that all matter was composed of one or more of four elements, earth, water, air, and fire.
 This is akin to the four states of matter, solid, liquid, gas, and plasma,
 Alloys are basically two or more metals mixed together, and don't forget that there are a lot of elements on the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, as are gold and silver.
 There are also alloys, which contain some non-metals, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made up of tiny little particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so incredibly small that a few of them could fit inside the period at the end of this sentence.
 So, the pencil came into being and the pencil has remained a good tool for many people.
 Unfortunately, a newer writing system came along and made the pencil less important.
 Now people don't need to write messages on a computer screen and they don't need to get close to a pencil sharpener.
 People are just wondering what the keyboard will look like if something new is going to be created.
 The fission bomb, on the other hand, requires a great deal of energy to bring the nuclei together.
 It's like rolling a heavy wagon up a hill and then splitting the uranium again,
 Some of the atoms have unstable nuclei, which means they tend to split apart on their own,
 The crust is about 70 km thick on the near side and 100 km thick on the far side.
 The fault is about 70 kilometres wide at the nearer end, and about 100 kilometres wide at the far end.
 The crust is thinner under Maria, and thicker under the highlands.
 Because the crust is thinner, it may be that there are more Maria in the nearer part.
 Theories of content focus on what causes people to behave in a certain way or to be led to behave in a certain way.
 These theories suggest that people have innate desires or needs that are internalized by the time they become adults.
 These theories look at what makes a person want to do a certain thing and what makes them want to do it in their environment.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 Typically, two behaviors will start to emerge as the manager begins to lead by example.
 And this type of manager is not welcomed by people who make these kinds of decisions,
 At the other end of the spectrum, the team member who thinks that he or she has to change everything that the team has been doing and make it his or her own way.
 And the team's success ultimately rests on the shoulders of the leader.
 This behavior creates confusion among the team leader and the members.
 A virtual team, for example, maintains the same standards of excellence as a traditional team, but with subtle differences.
 The virtual team members often serve as a point of contact for the real team members.
 They are often given more autonomy because of the changing time zones,
 And the early reports say the plane was diverted back to Afghanistan after being denied an emergency landing in rmqi.
 The invisible team is the management team that each member reports to, and this team sets the standards for each member.
 Why does it take so much time to set up a learning organization?
 All the resources available to an organization are used efficiently, and creativity and innovation can flourish.
 As a result, the organization's collaborative process of overcoming obstacles can lead to new innovative processes that meet the customer's needs.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must create a culture of shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the Continuum approach as a way to help organizations achieve a higher level of performance.
 Neurobiological data provides the empirical evidence that is necessary when taking a theoretical approach to cognitive ability research.
 The correlation between brain pathology and behavior helps inform the researchers.
 There are various types of brain injury, trauma, tumor,
 The advent of new technologies has allowed us to observe and investigate the brain's structure and processes in ways that were not possible before.
 This gives us a lot of information and data to help us build a simulation model that will help us to understand the inner workings of the mind.
 AI, though, strongly evokes science fiction, but it's a very important area of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of computers.
 AI research includes the study of automating tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 For example, writing, voice, face recognition, of course, control, planning, scheduling, and customer diagnostics and answering questions.
 These things have become a separate discipline, focusing on solving problems that arise in everyday life.
 AI systems are now being used in many different areas, such as economics, health care, engineering, and the military.
 Fieldwork is a big part of every class.
 Technology helps with virtual field trips, allowing students to see museum exhibits,
 Virtual field trips are a great way to look back on field trips and share your future classroom experience.
 The definition has geographic variations, where the age limit might be shorter in places such as North Carolina than in the rest of the state.
 Blogging helps improve student writing, too, as students often start a Blog with poor grammar and spelling, but the presence of readers generally forces them to change.
 Most of the students are the most critical audience, so Bloggers try to improve their writing to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also encourages students to be more interested in what they are doing.
 Blogging encourages collaboration and helps students to extend their learning beyond the traditional classroom.
 The proper use of Blogs is to actively respond to Internet materials,
 Ottawa is Canada's charming dual-language capital, and its diverse art galleries and museums illuminate Canada's past and present.
 The Niagara falls are in the extreme South, and Muskoka is in the North.
 All of these things make Ontario stand out as a true Canadian.
 The northern part of the country is sparsely populated, with only a few areas having any significant human population.
 This will surprise a lot of people.
 The Islands of East Africa lie along the East African coast.
 Madagascar is currently the largest and most unique of the wildlife reserves.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent or associated with France, and are known for their luxurious Beach resorts.
 Islam was also brought through Arabs, and there was a great change in the Comoros and Mayotte regions.
 The influence and the colonialism of Europe began in the fifteenth century, when Portuguese explorer Vasco Da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 North of it is the Sahel, and to the South and West, the Atlantic ocean.
 All female travelers are encouraged to answer as married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 And wearing a ring helps, too.
 Women are often seen as less likely to be considered as a result of the cultural difference,
 And to refuse to accept the men's point of view,
 Modern-day Casablanca was founded in the tenth century BC by Berber fishermen, and was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and Byzantines.
 The Portuguese rebuilt it, but after the 1755 earthquake, they abandoned it and moved to Casa Branca.
 The Moroccan Sultan rebuilt it as Daru l-Badya, and the Spanish traders who settled here called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting shopping places in Morocco.
 In the old Medina, you can easily find traditional Moroccan products such as Tajine, pottery, leather goods, water pipes, and a variety of other Moroccan goods, but all of them are for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the eastern part of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was devastated by the Nyiragongo volcano, which destroyed the city, including most of its roads.
 Goma is a fairly safe place, but if you are visiting Goma from the outside, you should do some research to understand the ongoing conflict in North Kivu.
 And also, the city is the base for the cheapest mountain gorilla trekking in Africa and the Nyiragongo volcano climb.
 You can use a moto-taxi to go around the city, and the regular price is 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 The relative approachability of Timbuktu, however, made it an ideal place for the trade.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor town, but it has become a tourist destination because of its fame.
 As a result of the desert's influence, Timbuktu was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites in 1990.
 This was the most prominent feature of Henry Louis Gates's PBS special, the wonder of Africa.
 The city is more Arabic in its orientation than any other city in Mali,
 Kruger National Park is located in northeastern South Africa, bordered by Mozambique to the northeast, Zimbabwe to the north, Botswana to the south, and Swaziland to the southwest.
 The park covers an area of 19,500 square kilometres and is divided into fourteen different zones, each supporting a different range of wildlife.
 This is one of South Africa's flagship national parks.
 Like all South African national parks, there is an entrance fee and a conservation levy.
 You may be able to purchase a Wildcard for entry into a specific South African National Park or the entire South African National Parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the place that gives Hong Kong its name and is the main tourist destination.
 The skyline of Hong Kong, with its rows of skyscrapers, is likened to a string of pearls.
 To get the best view of Hong Kong, leave the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront.
 Most of the development in Hong Kong is concentrated along the northern coast.
 Here is where British colonial developers would have claimed ownership of what was once a colonial territory.
 Sundarbans is the world's largest mangrove belt, extending 80 km from the coast of Bangladesh to the Sundarbans.
 Sundarbans is a UNESCO world heritage site, and part of it is designated as the Sundarbans National Park.
 This forest is not just a simple mangrove swamp, it is part of the once great Ganges plain.
 The Sundarbans, covering an area of 3,850 km, is about one-third of which is covered by water and marshy land.
 Since 1966, Sundarbans has been a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are 400 Bengal tigers and 30,000 deer in the region.
 Buses run all day long at the intercity bus terminal, but buses to Jakarta and Bogor only leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 The fare is often one thousand yen, and it is best to buy a ticket a few days in advance.
 In most areas, a comfortable and sturdy small Japanese-Style coaster bus is used.
 Shared taxis are a quick and comfortable way to travel to nearby areas, such as Nu 150 to Phu Naka.
 The Oyapock River bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that connects the Oyapock River and the city of Oiapoque, Brazil, to Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, French Guiana.
 The two towers are 83 meters high, and the length of the bridge is 378 meters, with two 3.50-meter-wide lanes.
 The vertical gap between the two is 15 meters, and the construction was finished in August 2011, with the restriction on the use of the bridge being lifted in March 2017.
 This bridge is scheduled to be fully operational by September of 2017.
 The Guarani are the most important indigenous group, living in eastern Paraguay.
 The Chaco region was home to a number of other indigenous peoples, such as the Guaycuru and the Payaguas.
 Paraguay, called the giant of the Indies, was born in the sixteenth century when Spanish conquerors and indigenous peoples met.
 The Spanish people began a three-century-long period of colonial rule.
 Since the foundation of Asuncin in 1537, Paraguay has maintained a great deal of its indigenous characteristics and identity.
 Argentina is known for having the best polo team and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in December at the Polo Stadium in Las Canitas.
 You can also watch smaller tournaments and games here during other periods of the year.
 For tournament news and ticket information, check out the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is pegged to the British pound sterling.
 You can exchange your money at the only bank on the island, which is right across from FIC West store.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere, and Stanley credit cards and U S . dollars are also generally accepted.
 In the United Kingdom, the British pound and the U S . dollar are accepted, but credit cards are not.
 It is almost impossible to get off the Islands and exchange the Falkland pound before you leave.
 Montevideo is located just south of the equator, so when it's winter in the northern hemisphere, it's summer there.
 Montevideo is a temperate zone, with summer temperatures usually around thirty degrees.
 Winters can be unbelievably cold, with days falling below freezing, although the wind and humidity combine to make it feel even colder.
 And there's no real distinction between the rainy and the dry season.
 Many of the park's animals are used to seeing humans, but it's important to remember that they are still wild.
 According to the park authority, bears and wolves must be at least 100 yards apart, and all other wildlife at least 25 yards apart.
 However, it is speculated to make a run for president in 2016.
 Every year, dozens of visitors are injured by not keeping a proper distance, and these animals are big, wild, and dangerous, so keep your distance.
 Additionally, the smell can attract bears or other wildlife, so it's best to avoid foods that have a strong odor.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa, a town on the island of Upolu, with a population of just under 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 This port was the site of a famous naval standoff in 1889 when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the port.
 Except for one British cruiser, all of the ships sank, and about two hundred Americans and Germans were killed.
 During the Mau movement, which was organised to fight for independence, there was a peaceful meeting in the village that led to the death of the paramount chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Auckland has two harbours, which makes it a popular place for beaches.
 North shore Beach is located on the Pacific Ocean, and stretches from North of Long Beach to the South of Devinport.
 There are almost all sandy beaches, and most of them are shaded by Pohutukawa trees.
 Tamaki drive is located on the Waitemata harbour,
 These beaches are usually family beaches, and there are a variety of shops lined up along the coast.
 The main local beer is called Number One, which is not a complex but a refreshingly crisp beer.
 There are many French wines to try, but New Zealand and Australian wines are also easily found.
 The local tap water is safe to drink, but you can easily buy bottled water if you're concerned.
 For Australians, the concept of flat white is a bit of a mystery, short black is espresso, and cappuccino is creamy, not frothy.
 The hot chocolate is according to Belgian standards. The fruit juice is expensive, but it's very tasty.
 These coral reefs are visited year-round, but injuries from the reefs themselves are rare.
 But heed the advice of a friend and be careful to heed all the warning signs.
 Box jellyfish are found from October to April, and sometimes even during the summer.
 Sharks really do exist, although they are very, very rare.
 The sea turtle does not live in the sea, but rather in the rivers that flow into the North Atlantic.
 By making reservations in advance, a traveler knows where he or she will be staying when he or she arrives at the destination.
 The agency often has a special deal on a particular hotel, but you can also book other kinds of accommodation through them.
 Travel agents usually offer a package that includes breakfast, airport pickup, and a round-trip airline ticket and hotel.
 We also need to make sure that we have time to make a decision or to acquire other documents, such as a visa, if needed.
 However, if there are any modifications or requests, please do not contact the hotel directly, but first contact the travel agency.
 At a few festivals, like the music festival, many people decide to camp out, and most attendees think it's a must-have experience.
 To be close to the music and to get a good spot,
 Although the concerts on the main stage may end,
 Some of the festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 The North Sea is a tourist destination in the extreme North of Europe.
 The St Petersburg cruise includes time in the city, and cruise passengers are exempt from the visa requirement.
 Casinos generally try to maximize the amount of time and money that their customers spend.
 They're constantly making sure that the visitors stay and continue to have a good time.
 But in some places, they're free to serve alcohol, although some good gamblers know that drinking makes for poorer judgment.
 If you are going to drive over high altitudes or mountain roads, you need to consider the possibility of snow, ice, or even sub-zero temperatures.
 The ice and snow reduce friction, so you can't drive as well as you would on a dry asphalt road.
 In a blizzard, snow can fall at a rate of up to four inches per hour.
 And also, falling snow, or raindrops, or even the windshield of a vehicle can limit your view.
 On the other hand, many countries have roads that are always open,
 The safari is perhaps the most wonderful tourist attraction in Africa, and will be a highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari is widely known and is used to describe overland travel to view the wildlife of Africa, especially in the savanna.
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes, tend to approach the car, and can be well observed using standard equipment.
 Lions, cheetahs, and tigers are sometimes shy and use binoculars to better observe.
 Bushwalking, or bush-walking, is a form of hiking that consists of a few hours or days of walking.
 The Paralympic games will be held from August 24 to September 5.
 Tokyo, which hosted the 1964 summer Olympics, will become the only Asian city to host the summer Olympics twice.
 If you booked a flight and a hotel before the announcement was made,
 The refund policy varies, but as of March, the Olympics are not expected to be held until July of 2020.
 Most event ticket prices are between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, with the average ticket price being around 7,000 yen.
 Wringing out wet clothes helps them to dry faster, and many hotels have a drying rack and ironing board that guests can use.
 If you don't have an iron, or if you don't like to iron your socks,
 And don't let the fabric get too hot.
 There are other ways of purifying water, some of which are more effective at certain contaminants.
 In some areas, it's enough to boil the water for one minute,
 The filters vary in their effectiveness, and in cases where water quality is a concern, I would recommend buying a brand of bottled water that you trust.
 Travellers may encounter an animal pest that is rare in their own region.
 Pests make food go bad, cause inflammation, or worse, cause an allergic reaction, spread poison, or transmit disease.
 The disease itself, or a dangerous animal that can hurt or kill a person, is not usually considered a pest.
 Duty-Free shopping is a practice of allowing customers to purchase goods at a store without paying the government's tax and duty.
 Heavy taxed countries, travelers can save a lot of money, especially when it comes to buying liquor or cigarettes.
 Located in a remote and rugged terrain, the road between point Marion and Fairmont is known as the most difficult section of the Pennsylvania Turnpike.
 If you're not used to rural driving, beware of steep grades, narrow lanes, and sharp curves.
 The posted speed limit is noticeably lower than in the previous and the following sections,
 Interestingly, cell phone service is much stronger here than at any of the other points on this route.
 German pastries are quite good, and in Bavaria, they're similar to Austria, with a lot of butter and variety.
 Fruit pastries are common, and apples are used year-round in pastries, while cherries and plums are usually used in the summer.
 In Germany, a lot of baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts.
 If you want a small but tasty bread, try a local one called a Berliner, a Pfannkuchen, or a Krapfen.
 Curry is a dish that is based on herbs, spices, and meat or vegetables.
 The amount of water in the soup can vary from ""thick"" to ""thin.
 In the North of India and Pakistan, it is commonly used in curry.
 Indonesian food is a catch-all term for the diverse regional cuisines of the country's 17,000 islands.
 But even more so when used without restriction, the term tends to mean food from the central and eastern parts of the main Java Island.
 Now, a wide variety of simple, seasonal dishes are characteristic, and the main spices favored by the Javanese are peanut, chili, and sugar, particularly Javanese coconut sugar.
 The backrest is a support for the rider's feet,
 This device gives the rider a much more stable feel, but it can cause a rider to fall if the foot slips.
 The rider, however, is able to minimize this danger by taking several safety precautions.
 First, most of the riders have heels that are high and the bottoms of their boots are narrow and tight.
 Next, some saddles, especially in the UK, have a safety strap which can be pulled to release the rider in the event of a fall.
 Cocham Valley is known as the Yosemite Valley of Chile, and it has a variety of large granite walls and rocky peaks.
 The summit of the mountain is a breathtakingly beautiful view,
 Including skiing and snowboarding, a downhill snow sport is a popular one involving skiing or snowboarding down a snow-covered terrain.
 Skiing is a popular sport, and ski resorts are often located in areas of high altitude.
 The idea of skiing is a very old one, with cave paintings depicting skiers dating back to 5,000 BC.
 As a sport, downhill skiing dates at least to the eighteenth century, and the first recreational ski club was founded in Australia by Norwegian settlers in 1861.
 Skiing in the backcountry: This activity is also known as backcountry skiing, ski touring, or ski hiking.
 This activity, although it may involve Alpine-Style skiing or hiking, usually does not include these, and in the latter case, is done on steep terrain, requiring much more dense ski and boot.
 Think of a ski course as a similar hiking course.
 In good conditions, you can go a little bit further than walking, but not as fast as cross-country skiing.
 Europe is a continent with relatively few independent countries, but usually, traveling between them means going through multiple visa applications and passport checks.
 But the Schengen zone, in this regard, acts a bit like a country.
 In this zone, a holder of a passport may generally cross the border without re-entering the passport control area.
 Similarly, holding a Schengen visa means that you do not have to apply for a visa to each Schengen country individually,
 There is no universal definition of antiques, and in some countries, a product that is over 100 years old is considered an antique.
 In North America, the age of antiques is defined as being a little bit younger than in Europe.
 Handmade items will not be considered antiques, even if they are no less worn than mass-produced similar items.
 Reindeer husbandry is one of the Sami's main livelihoods, and trade is important to many other practitioners.
 Traditionally, all Smi have not been involved in large-scale reindeer herding, but most of them have raised reindeer as pack animals,
 Today, several Sami people are involved in modern trade, and tourism is an important source of income in the Sami area of Sapmi.
 Especially among non-Romany, people, it is widely used, but it is often considered to be offensive and inaccurate.
 If the country you're visiting becomes a travel warning area, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning scientists used it as a baseline and compared the three other treatments to it.
 As an example, Middle Eastern American citizens may find themselves in a different situation than European or Arab Americans.
 The warning is just a brief summary of the political situation in a given country.
 The viewpoint given is a more detailed one, obtained elsewhere, and is compared with the more superficial, general, and over-simplified view.
 Weather is the state of the atmosphere at a given time and place.
 Weather can occur anywhere on the planet, and it comes in many different forms.
 Storms, hail, abnormal precipitation, and forest fires are forms and effects of adverse weather.
 Weather phenomena that are highly localized in time and space include blizzards, snowstorms, and dust storms.
 Travellers should look up the local weather before they go to avoid any disruptions to their travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country that is considered a combat zone should be sure to receive professional training.
 An Internet search for a hostile environment course will probably give you the local company's address.
 The lecture will usually cover all of the topics discussed here in much greater detail, and usually with a lot of practical experience.
 The course usually lasts two to five days and involves role-playing, first aid, and sometimes weapons training.
 Books and magazines dealing with wild survival are common, but publications dealing with war zones are rare.
 Transgender travellers planning to have a gender reassignment surgery abroad should make sure they have valid documentation with them when they return.
 Some countries will issue a passport with an X in the gender field,
 The willingness to accept these documents from foreign governments is also very varied.
 Since the September 11, 2001, era, airport security screening has become even more of a nuisance.
 Transgender people before surgery are not expected to pass the scanner.
 Rip currents are a type of ocean current that often results from breaking waves.
 The systematic classification of the water column allows for the concentration of some deep water species, which in turn allows for rapid currents and deep-sea life.
 And the majority of them are likely to die from exhaustion before they can swim against the current.
 If you just get out of the current, you can swim back to shore.
 Or you might be able to swim to a place where you're not going to be swept away by the current,
 The re-entry shock, because there's no honeymoon phase,
 Adapting to a new culture is often difficult for travelers,
 In returning home, he will adapt himself to the customs of his own country,
 When you first went abroad, the travelers would have been inclined to be patient and understanding.
 People may not think it necessary to have patience and understanding for the returning travelers.
 The pyramid sound and light show is one of the most popular attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramid in the darkness and you can see the pyramid in silence before the show starts.
 You're always going to hear the sounds of tourists and vendors.
 The sponge is set up as a background and narrator of the long story.
 Scenes were projected on the pyramids, and other pyramids were illuminated.
 The South Shetland Islands were discovered in 1819, and are claimed by several countries, with the most being Antarctic bases.
 At the extremes of the poll, 29 per cent of those surveyed believe Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, while 31 per cent believe Australia should never become a republic.
 The other includes Livingston Island and Disappointment Island, which still have active volcanoes and provide natural harbors.
 Elsworth is located on the Southern tip of the peninsula, and is adjacent to Belingshausen.
 Here the mountain of the peninsula is again and again divided by the Minnesota glacier into a 360-kilometer belt.
 North of the Antarctic circle, or in the Southernmost part of the continent, is the highest mountain, Vinson Massif, at 4,892 meters.
 A satellite phone may be the only alternative if you're in a remote area outside of your phone's range.
 Satellite phones are not usually a replacement for a mobile phone,
 The service is used frequently by ocean-going vessels, including pleasure craft, and for on-board data and voice services.
 We'll get more information from the local telecommunications service provider.
 Gap year travel and study is becoming more and more popular.
 This is especially popular with graduates, allowing them to take a year out of their studies without it counting as a full gap year.
 In most cases, registering for a gap-year course will actually increase your chances of going on to higher education back home.
 Generally speaking, there is a fee to enroll in these training programs.
 Finland is a good place to enjoy boating, and the land of a thousand lakes has thousands of islands.
 And you don't need a boat in the archipelago and the Lake.
 Although the coastal Islands and large lakes are big enough for any yacht,
 In Finland, boating is a national pastime, with seven to eight boats per person.
 This is a similar case in Norway, Sweden, and New Zealand, but it's quite unique outside of those countries.
 And the majority of Baltic cruises are now offering a longer stay in St Petersburg.
 This allows you to visit the historic city for a full day and then return to the ship for an overnight.
 If you're going to the coast by sea, you don't need a separate visa.
 Some cruise ships, however, include Berlin, Germany, on their itineraries, although Berlin is not close to the sea and is not included in the cruise price.
 For everyone, flying in an airplane can be a scary experience,
 This is nothing to be ashamed of, and it is no different from the personal fears, disgusts, and aversions that most people have.
 And the idea is that by understanding how the plane works and what happens during flight,
 The courier company receives a large sum of money in return for delivering the goods quickly.
 But the airline uses its own planes on some routes,
 If you sent it by air cargo, then it could take several days to clear customs.
 The only way to get it processed faster was to send it as checked baggage,
 First-class or business class is the only sure way to pay for privilege,
 And it's not cheap, roughly the equivalent of four business class or first class tickets.
 In general, a direct flight from A to B is usually not worth the hassle of trying to get a seat upgrade.
 Airlines know that there's a certain core group of people who are willing to pay a lot of money for the privilege of getting there quickly and comfortably.
 The capital is Chisinau, and the main language is Romanian, although Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multiethnic Republic that has suffered from ethnic conflict.
 The Report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the present policy of the Executive towards Iraq and it urges an immediate change of direction.
 Although the political negotiations broke down, the economic relationship was restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is the Eastern Orthodox Church.
 Izmir is Turkey's third largest city, with a population of around three and a half million, and is the second largest port after Istanbul.
 Once a great ancient city, Smirna is now a modern, developed, and thriving commercial center surrounded by a great harbor and mountains.
 This city has more of a Mediterranean European feel than the traditional Turkish one, but it's still got the wide avenues, the modern shopping centers,
 Haldarsvik is a small village with a unique octagonal church.
 There are also some interesting marble sculptures on the tombs.
 I'd spend thirty minutes walking around this interesting town.
 To the North, there is the easily accessible, romantic, and enchanting town of Sintra, which is famous among foreigners for its record of the splendor.
 Scotturb bus number 403 regularly runs to Sintra, with stops in Cabo da Roca.
 To the North, also, is the world-famous site of the Virgin Mary's apparition, the Basilica of the Holy House at Fatima.
 This is basically a huge cemetery and a place of great importance to the world's population.
 There are still a lot of people who survived here,
 Please show respect, solemnity, and courtesy to the place.
 Do not scratch or scribble on the site.
 Barcelona's official languages are Catalan and Spanish, with about half of the population preferring Catalan, and the vast majority understanding it,
 But most of the signs are in Catalan, the official language established by law.
 But Spanish is widely used in public transport and other facilities.
 The regular announcements on the metro are only in Catalan, but during a planned service interruption, the automatic system broadcasts in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic, and Japanese.
 Parisians are known to be arrogant, rude, and self-centered.
 But usually this is just a fixed idea, and the best way to get along in Paris is still to behave like a ""bien lev(well-bred)"" person.
 The Parisians's blunt exterior would quickly disappear if only basic courtesy were shown.
 The Plitvice Lakes National Park is a dense forest of fir, beech, and alpine and Mediterranean plants.
 With a wide range of different climates, soils, and elevations, there are a wide range of different plant communities.
 The region is also home to a wide variety of animals and birds.
 There, in addition to the European Brown bear, wolf, Eagle, Owl, Spermophilus, and the commoner species,
 During a visit to the monastery, women are required to wear a skirt that covers their knees and to have their shoulders covered.
 Most monasteries will provide a covering for you to put over your shoulders, but especially if you bring a brightly colored one, you will be greeted at the entrance by a monk or a nun with a smile.
 Along the same line, a man is required to wear pants that cover his knees.
 You can rent one at the entrance, but it's not washed every time you use it, so it can be uncomfortable to wear.
 And it's a lot like the food of the Mediterranean,
 Simple yet especially popular in the summer, a favorite evening meal is Parems, bread with a simple and easily obtainable sauce of tomato, olive oil, and Parmesan cheese.
 And the word Sie, which means you, is always capitalized in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and nouns.
 And it's a bit tricky to read, but it's definitely easier to read.
 Italian is a relatively easy language to learn because most of the words are pronounced exactly as they are written.
 The main characters to be aware of are c and g, which vary depending on the vowel that follows.
 And also to pronounce r and rr differently. Caro means dear, but Carro means a cart.
 Persian is relatively easy and has a mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar introduction will help you to learn a great deal about Persian grammar and to better understand the phrases.
 Of course, if you know romance languages, it will be easier to learn Portuguese.
 But people who know a little bit of Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese is just like Spanish.
 Pre-Modern observatories are usually museums or educational sites today.
 In their day, light pollution was not at the same level as it is today, so they were located in places that are easily accessible, like cities and campuses.
 Most of the modern research telescopes are located in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The Cherry blossom viewing, or Hanami, is part of Japanese culture that dates back to the eighth century.
 This concept is derived from the Chinese selection of the plum blossom as a part of their culture.
 Japan's first cherry blossom party was held in the Imperial Palace,
 The best-looking specimens are the ones that tempt us to say,
 And visiting a formally arranged garden to collect samples is, well,
 Singapore is generally a very safe place to travel, and it is extremely easy to get around once you arrive.
 But if you're in a high-temperature, high-Uv environment,
 And also the Bible's patriarchs, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives, traditionally buried in Hebron.
 The bus you're trying to take is not going to Kiryat Arba, but to Hebron.
 Inland waterways can be a great subject for a holiday.
 For example, visit the castles of the Rhine Valley, the Rhine River, or take a cruise on the Danube River.
 They're also planning popular hiking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important and biggest holidays in the Christian religion.
 Many of the traditions surrounding the holiday have become universalized.
 And it's a tradition to stay awake and watch the sunrise on Easter morning.
 Of course, there are Christian theological explanations for this, but it could be a pre-Christian spring and fertility ritual.
 The more traditional churches hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday night,
 All of the animals that first came to the island were able to swim, fly, or float to it.
 Mammals, however, could not travel as far from the mainland.
 Since the arrival of humans, goats, cows, rats, cats, and dogs have been introduced to the Islands.
 If you visit the North and South poles in the winter, you will experience the midnight sun,
 The sky is so dark all day long that it gives you a good chance to see the Aurora.
 Because the area is sparsely populated, light pollution is not a problem, and the night sky is visible.
 Japanese workplace culture is more hierarchical and formal than Westerners.
 The suit is the standard of business attire, and colleagues refer to each other by their first names.
 In the workplace, teamwork is very important, so teamwork is emphasized over individual performance.
 The worker must receive the approval of his or her supervisor before making any decision.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.1737782899816635, 'precisions': [0.5778035657769807, 0.29187562688064195, 0.17278847289476792, 0.10557718879537746], 'brevity_penalty': 0.7378698961356032, 'length_ratio': 0.7668783625257878, 'translation_length': 18958, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 43.28474127285098, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.8062178058174287, 'scores': [0.77347332239151, 0.8545562624931335, 0.891987681388855, 0.4769967198371887, 0.6732770800590515, 0.8037645816802979, 0.857133150100708, 0.6343746781349182, 0.8985151648521423, 0.9468247294425964, 0.9158843159675598, 0.6706638932228088, 0.9354646801948547, 0.8589725494384766, 0.7622502446174622, 0.6931361556053162, 0.6236196160316467, 0.8513968586921692, 0.8714866042137146, 0.8030126690864563, 0.914645254611969, 0.9241247773170471, 0.8337727189064026, 0.79671710729599, 0.6661924719810486, 0.9359354376792908, 0.7942979335784912, 0.6902750730514526, 0.8362569212913513, 0.9345859885215759, 0.5280625224113464, 0.7469937205314636, 0.6848849058151245, 0.7362729907035828, 0.9371969103813171, 0.8783524036407471, 0.7693586945533752, 0.9112465977668762, 0.8506994247436523, 0.8669558167457581, 0.8287216424942017, 0.938092052936554, 0.8946338891983032, 0.8754791617393494, 0.4200444519519806, 0.7386810183525085, 0.8181387186050415, 0.8754046559333801, 0.8723990321159363, 0.5283854007720947, 0.913244903087616, 0.8589912056922913, 0.8873842358589172, 0.9251919984817505, 0.7545890212059021, 0.8752143979072571, 0.6858798861503601, 0.6207728981971741, 0.8177756667137146, 0.9289748072624207, 0.8543186783790588, 0.8864939212799072, 0.8415413498878479, 0.8619667887687683, 0.8566297888755798, 0.8287100195884705, 0.7750434875488281, 0.838366687297821, 0.9232525825500488, 0.8958157896995544, 0.8926534056663513, 0.6330709457397461, 0.46689194440841675, 0.7263318300247192, 0.8640815019607544, 0.6569663882255554, 0.8850855231285095, 0.44594767689704895, 0.9364399313926697, 0.489916056394577, 0.7302860021591187, 0.6804176568984985, 0.8517025113105774, 0.7665886282920837, 0.790522038936615, 0.86925208568573, 0.7591603398323059, 0.7708821892738342, 0.8573763370513916, 0.6350929141044617, 0.6787706613540649, 0.9004084467887878, 0.838085949420929, 0.9123108386993408, 0.83933025598526, 0.9308356642723083, 0.9318563342094421, 0.6583486199378967, 0.7572760581970215, 0.8038985133171082, 0.8876916766166687, 0.7361342310905457, 0.641839325428009, 0.9159836173057556, 0.8843702673912048, 0.7796201109886169, 0.8982922434806824, 0.8486019372940063, 0.7128223180770874, 0.6382473707199097, 0.9027991890907288, 0.9157034754753113, 0.9126222729682922, 0.8923754096031189, 0.6853336095809937, 0.7566247582435608, 0.8886675238609314, 0.8846501708030701, 0.9647555947303772, 0.7756733298301697, 0.7608872056007385, 0.8054727911949158, 0.9084812998771667, 0.9071136116981506, 0.8059371113777161, 0.5280959010124207, 0.8271203637123108, 0.9003971219062805, 0.8693140745162964, 0.918890655040741, 0.58439040184021, 0.7172945141792297, 0.858048141002655, 0.9435610175132751, 0.8972030282020569, 0.8903207182884216, 0.9064305424690247, 0.8812541365623474, 0.936510443687439, 0.8968560099601746, 0.8888724446296692, 0.8686910271644592, 0.9194817543029785, 0.8813793063163757, 0.6183867454528809, 0.7188748717308044, 0.836577832698822, 0.898361325263977, 0.8729407787322998, 0.9110950827598572, 0.8992130160331726, 0.42911919951438904, 0.7811762094497681, 0.8416197896003723, 0.6565291285514832, 0.8654555082321167, 0.8951075077056885, 0.7185748219490051, 0.7640802264213562, 0.8805286288261414, 0.8321486115455627, 0.49390217661857605, 0.8667265772819519, 0.6740550994873047, 0.8607054352760315, 0.7706517577171326, 0.7262137532234192, 0.9046036005020142, 0.6663112044334412, 0.6430405974388123, 0.8602594137191772, 0.9263773560523987, 0.901759147644043, 0.5659721493721008, 0.7278912663459778, 0.8815608620643616, 0.7402488589286804, 0.854740560054779, 0.3453616797924042, 0.6919820308685303, 0.8743863105773926, 0.44344189763069153, 0.8111047148704529, 0.8914046287536621, 0.876093864440918, 0.7066009044647217, 0.9427775740623474, 0.3543010652065277, 0.8085766434669495, 0.5410630702972412, 0.8396132588386536, 0.5768724679946899, 0.7942129969596863, 0.8081934452056885, 0.814829409122467, 0.9421585202217102, 0.450549453496933, 0.5702162981033325, 0.944563627243042, 0.8469526171684265, 0.5764558911323547, 0.7906844019889832, 0.799859881401062, 0.8009105920791626, 0.881581723690033, 0.8353960514068604, 0.8459567427635193, 0.8446853160858154, 0.8326826691627502, 0.8969146013259888, 0.9232152104377747, 0.8803901672363281, 0.9132797122001648, 0.6434345245361328, 0.8602648973464966, 0.9187189936637878, 0.9231694340705872, 0.7876638770103455, 0.8829296231269836, 0.8816097378730774, 0.953460156917572, 0.9006105661392212, 0.8888174295425415, 0.8802735805511475, 0.7927902340888977, 0.9217882752418518, 0.8956757187843323, 0.7883980870246887, 0.8164417147636414, 0.6961955428123474, 0.8552435040473938, 0.8282050490379333, 0.7286978363990784, 0.8127389550209045, 0.5532518625259399, 0.7393099665641785, 0.5462574362754822, 0.9026193618774414, 0.815925657749176, 0.8595166802406311, 0.6940248012542725, 0.7176200747489929, 0.7722428441047668, 0.865667998790741, 0.8695765137672424, 0.9229465126991272, 0.7895810008049011, 0.646547794342041, 0.4096592366695404, 0.9391108751296997, 0.8497825860977173, 0.8966271877288818, 0.9094527959823608, 0.9353589415550232, 0.9031721949577332, 0.8539966940879822, 0.32016709446907043, 0.9119320511817932, 0.8725419044494629, 0.7797310948371887, 0.8671750426292419, 0.8092769384384155, 0.9186723232269287, 0.6268261671066284, 0.9358856081962585, 0.8002102971076965, 0.7331154942512512, 0.40738916397094727, 0.9285575747489929, 0.8932082056999207, 0.8733400106430054, 0.8255157470703125, 0.8623203635215759, 0.8485115766525269, 0.5849807262420654, 0.6853521466255188, 0.7925598621368408, 0.8063877820968628, 0.5432971119880676, 0.9296619296073914, 0.6224533915519714, 0.818000853061676, 0.8977344036102295, 0.8905983567237854, 0.9135544896125793, 0.9414307475090027, 0.8541929721832275, 0.8139914274215698, 0.9140418171882629, 0.5148430466651917, 0.8897100687026978, 0.7980713248252869, 0.8464107513427734, 0.7988666892051697, 0.8123647570610046, 0.8699694871902466, 0.8846895098686218, 0.8780626654624939, 0.6067950129508972, 0.821185290813446, 0.8816602826118469, 0.8755512833595276, 0.902072548866272, 0.8951151967048645, 0.6066533923149109, 0.652757465839386, 0.798203706741333, 0.7938124537467957, 0.9241308569908142, 0.9090596437454224, 0.9147387146949768, 0.9108424782752991, 0.7601499557495117, 0.8075231909751892, 0.7795962691307068, 0.9210123419761658, 0.6943932175636292, 0.894604504108429, 0.8612093329429626, 0.9185057282447815, 0.5892469882965088, 0.46042194962501526, 0.8187850713729858, 0.7943747639656067, 0.8679744601249695, 0.7145009636878967, 0.5733792185783386, 0.839455246925354, 0.8871365189552307, 0.8860467076301575, 0.7078533172607422, 0.8700514435768127, 0.9412556290626526, 0.8990220427513123, 0.936465322971344, 0.9127413034439087, 0.8732399940490723, 0.8318662047386169, 0.8241557478904724, 0.882690966129303, 0.5347864031791687, 0.8782512545585632, 0.7497543096542358, 0.6663004159927368, 0.8006449937820435, 0.7706157565116882, 0.9074332118034363, 0.5940122604370117, 0.7631374001502991, 0.8626603484153748, 0.8801733255386353, 0.8524401783943176, 0.790493369102478, 0.7571496367454529, 0.899494469165802, 0.647517740726471, 0.9001976847648621, 0.8750521540641785, 0.8836905360221863, 0.7894129157066345, 0.634314239025116, 0.6358006000518799, 0.7800304293632507, 0.8574352264404297, 0.5332674980163574, 0.6573153138160706, 0.778682291507721, 0.7094654440879822, 0.7394666075706482, 0.8482308387756348, 0.6660905480384827, 0.6684209704399109, 0.44232720136642456, 0.8596356511116028, 0.9058687090873718, 0.8688296675682068, 0.9467372894287109, 0.3937189280986786, 0.8347691893577576, 0.8913946151733398, 0.796721339225769, 0.8628854155540466, 0.6026192903518677, 0.7251572012901306, 0.8507338166236877, 0.8190016150474548, 0.7402288317680359, 0.8627459406852722, 0.9060268998146057, 0.7803757786750793, 0.9062575697898865, 0.9141431450843811, 0.66920006275177, 0.832732081413269, 0.8742847442626953, 0.7652412056922913, 0.819635272026062, 0.9514569640159607, 0.647453248500824, 0.9280638098716736, 0.9033340811729431, 0.7267265915870667, 0.7923627495765686, 0.7003809213638306, 0.7805448174476624, 0.8375088572502136, 0.8735648989677429, 0.4778730571269989, 0.8178038597106934, 0.8968364000320435, 0.8479990363121033, 0.8399893045425415, 0.7636600732803345, 0.7704862952232361, 0.7975232005119324, 0.7986305356025696, 0.8738044500350952, 0.8452964425086975, 0.8712908625602722, 0.926832377910614, 0.9311197400093079, 0.8935614228248596, 0.5985483527183533, 0.7548620104789734, 0.6032317280769348, 0.7793835997581482, 0.6077856421470642, 0.8748531937599182, 0.8808835744857788, 0.9414669871330261, 0.772736668586731, 0.8583465218544006, 0.8766141533851624, 0.8288050889968872, 0.8652135729789734, 0.8719915151596069, 0.771145761013031, 0.8782259821891785, 0.9206296801567078, 0.7181779146194458, 0.8878265619277954, 0.7752875089645386, 0.9384870529174805, 0.7763640880584717, 0.809270441532135, 0.7011041045188904, 0.8571873307228088, 0.8005366921424866, 0.6831337809562683, 0.6664213538169861, 0.7336503267288208, 0.5762265920639038, 0.9215176105499268, 0.8498174548149109, 0.6049663424491882, 0.894197940826416, 0.7255545854568481, 0.9034327864646912, 0.428543359041214, 0.8611168265342712, 0.9377922415733337, 0.7327298521995544, 0.5094686150550842, 0.7292105555534363, 0.8614454865455627, 0.7387373447418213, 0.9177799224853516, 0.5526373982429504, 0.629425585269928, 0.43486523628234863, 0.7488948702812195, 0.6810149550437927, 0.6633340716362, 0.8491554856300354, 0.8630064129829407, 0.6603123545646667, 0.7656888365745544, 0.8693761825561523, 0.8332895636558533, 0.7989551424980164, 0.7356536984443665, 0.7674296498298645, 0.6210778951644897, 0.9126495718955994, 0.8848620057106018, 0.8719472885131836, 0.696776270866394, 0.7242045402526855, 0.6965512633323669, 0.8300154805183411, 0.8596693873405457, 0.8691115975379944, 0.9257657527923584, 0.9107286334037781, 0.8318746089935303, 0.834860622882843, 0.8954166769981384, 0.7014923691749573, 0.9297301173210144, 0.8084039092063904, 0.9051569700241089, 0.5545618534088135, 0.9067704081535339, 0.8291268348693848, 0.7180540561676025, 0.9388744235038757, 0.8923999667167664, 0.5361296534538269, 0.821539044380188, 0.7338575720787048, 0.6779670715332031, 0.5444077849388123, 0.8852699995040894, 0.805008590221405, 0.9154147505760193, 0.9130964875221252, 0.7905945181846619, 0.810302197933197, 0.8668314814567566, 0.8527222275733948, 0.863426148891449, 0.42870116233825684, 0.5308324694633484, 0.8297789692878723, 0.8988651037216187, 0.8520956039428711, 0.811576247215271, 0.7864407896995544, 0.8531008958816528, 0.8622316718101501, 0.7778863310813904, 0.81837397813797, 0.595131516456604, 0.7263143658638, 0.7018154859542847, 0.677969753742218, 0.8369918465614319, 0.8468984961509705, 0.7883554100990295, 0.8991300463676453, 0.664882481098175, 0.914499819278717, 0.8577781915664673, 0.8709495067596436, 0.8021529912948608, 0.9046942591667175, 0.8732172250747681, 0.9071773290634155, 0.6777927279472351, 0.9044074416160583, 0.8372460007667542, 0.9113430976867676, 0.8472288846969604, 0.9119564890861511, 0.8542987108230591, 0.852288544178009, 0.6217544674873352, 0.8660664558410645, 0.714448869228363, 0.7732487320899963, 0.8500974774360657, 0.8908600211143494, 0.8030760288238525, 0.8783709406852722, 0.7054169178009033, 0.7280301451683044, 0.7316569685935974, 0.8354844450950623, 0.751555860042572, 0.5953987836837769, 0.8725910782814026, 0.9022718667984009, 0.8150161504745483, 0.8432005047798157, 0.9199965596199036, 0.8582794070243835, 0.848264753818512, 0.8110515475273132, 0.8325361609458923, 0.8854554295539856, 0.8098376393318176, 0.6211408972740173, 0.8660833835601807, 0.8375079035758972, 0.8007377982139587, 0.874027669429779, 0.843809962272644, 0.8535389304161072, 0.930038332939148, 0.9164727926254272, 0.7895707488059998, 0.9105501770973206, 0.8115043044090271, 0.9042754769325256, 0.8244377970695496, 0.9135892987251282, 0.83438640832901, 0.8170972466468811, 0.8567320704460144, 0.9124673008918762, 0.8211488127708435, 0.658290684223175, 0.9093149304389954, 0.7809165716171265, 0.7488803267478943, 0.9347845911979675, 0.6316893696784973, 0.8041232228279114, 0.7870045900344849, 0.8582713603973389, 0.9030250906944275, 0.8606156706809998, 0.8202374577522278, 0.8822773694992065, 0.8373194336891174, 0.8139098286628723, 0.7247467637062073, 0.9606143236160278, 0.7442513108253479, 0.9134427905082703, 0.862765371799469, 0.8692628145217896, 0.9264339804649353, 0.6618373394012451, 0.7274560928344727, 0.8550803661346436, 0.8651265501976013, 0.9162229895591736, 0.8223459124565125, 0.6193254590034485, 0.7016458511352539, 0.604161262512207, 0.9419079422950745, 0.8674619793891907, 0.9387192130088806, 0.8105332851409912, 0.9019597172737122, 0.7967636585235596, 0.9245617389678955, 0.9248587489128113, 0.8763278126716614, 0.9294124245643616, 0.8873674273490906, 0.8677377700805664, 0.8141728043556213, 0.8245756030082703, 0.8208262920379639, 0.8083620071411133, 0.7766782641410828, 0.8557735085487366, 0.5988003015518188, 0.7092660069465637, 0.785214900970459, 0.6034174561500549, 0.7660285830497742, 0.9238263964653015, 0.8255730271339417, 0.8951699733734131, 0.6754738688468933, 0.5842732787132263, 0.8433563113212585, 0.8140131831169128, 0.8249933123588562, 0.8935813307762146, 0.9279031157493591, 0.7378961443901062, 0.490980327129364, 0.92326420545578, 0.7698816657066345, 0.8758378028869629, 0.9000553488731384, 0.9299792647361755, 0.9373863339424133, 0.8376455903053284, 0.8965944647789001, 0.6444991827011108, 0.9097183346748352, 0.8875560164451599, 0.9126032590866089, 0.9314063191413879, 0.8472959399223328, 0.9328445196151733, 0.862345278263092, 0.6570995450019836, 0.7638211250305176, 0.8667674660682678, 0.5639057159423828, 0.8933732509613037, 0.9067323803901672, 0.7783258557319641, 0.9203795790672302, 0.6466489434242249, 0.9172454476356506, 0.79062420129776, 0.7821543216705322, 0.79497891664505, 0.5438288450241089, 0.8584380149841309, 0.7921757102012634, 0.9252879023551941, 0.8703413605690002, 0.9147360324859619, 0.8399387001991272, 0.7995977997779846, 0.6852249503135681, 0.6246643662452698, 0.6136131286621094, 0.89886873960495, 0.907047688961029, 0.9067363142967224, 0.9341874718666077, 0.8525312542915344, 0.9252781271934509, 0.8771283626556396, 0.8655295372009277, 0.8614557981491089, 0.8562678694725037, 0.6404709219932556, 0.8974337577819824, 0.8363850712776184, 0.8560783267021179, 0.7589617967605591, 0.8337880969047546, 0.9191792607307434, 0.8768008947372437, 0.9178505539894104, 0.8578116297721863, 0.8812035322189331, 0.7292084097862244, 0.9359641075134277, 0.8384761810302734, 0.7364105582237244, 0.7896491885185242, 0.8636376261711121, 0.8242489695549011, 0.9056015610694885, 0.9135681390762329, 0.7609860301017761, 0.7595996856689453, 0.8241594433784485, 0.8515725135803223, 0.8656366467475891, 0.885673999786377, 0.8623268604278564, 0.824341893196106, 0.7161184549331665, 0.7980061173439026, 0.8397969603538513, 0.7941229939460754, 0.9366726875305176, 0.9337747693061829, 0.9143843650817871, 0.8862987160682678, 0.8915064930915833, 0.7742648720741272, 0.8791016340255737, 0.8690398335456848, 0.7124307751655579, 0.7742758989334106, 0.8885494470596313, 0.8865591287612915, 0.8922781944274902, 0.8079152703285217, 0.8368054032325745, 0.8720759153366089, 0.3383602201938629, 0.9024460315704346, 0.8361839056015015, 0.9091142416000366, 0.9720847606658936, 0.9228313565254211, 0.9125236868858337, 0.8788612484931946, 0.822752058506012, 0.8688015937805176, 0.8758057951927185, 0.6220545172691345, 0.8599489331245422, 0.8309536576271057, 0.8539270758628845, 0.9019262194633484, 0.7975887656211853, 0.9126692414283752, 0.8237411379814148, 0.7841982245445251, 0.7201082110404968, 0.6624031662940979, 0.8113364577293396, 0.8510233759880066, 0.8636439442634583, 0.8620285391807556, 0.7824057340621948, 0.8486601710319519, 0.8633099794387817, 0.6830281615257263, 0.6212424635887146, 0.9682410955429077, 0.49487999081611633, 0.9171019196510315, 0.7648319602012634, 0.761825680732727, 0.8078016638755798, 0.9120174050331116, 0.8424267172813416, 0.774444580078125, 0.7995188236236572, 0.6326154470443726, 0.9170708656311035, 0.9054958820343018, 0.8848012089729309, 0.8643223643302917, 0.7397279143333435, 0.8068520426750183, 0.911943793296814, 0.8015686273574829, 0.7370149493217468, 0.8556452393531799, 0.8127009272575378, 0.7346959710121155, 0.6906864047050476, 0.9018024802207947, 0.8156344294548035, 0.8884513974189758, 0.8786770105361938, 0.8950258493423462, 0.8540729880332947, 0.8544098734855652, 0.7997692227363586, 0.8418352007865906, 0.9057697653770447, 0.7377873063087463, 0.839540958404541, 0.8445736169815063, 0.8773937821388245, 0.8127090334892273, 0.8265960216522217, 0.8821142911911011, 0.8182548880577087, 0.7255269885063171, 0.8812841773033142, 0.8685609102249146, 0.8411710858345032, 0.7610543370246887, 0.788434624671936, 0.634101152420044, 0.807577908039093, 0.760603666305542, 0.8461730480194092, 0.5871906280517578, 0.8429945707321167, 0.6952797770500183, 0.9350541830062866, 0.9240297675132751, 0.9100701212882996, 0.8040997385978699, 0.8870787620544434, 0.7851733565330505, 0.8891396522521973, 0.8031455874443054, 0.8734575510025024, 0.8214030861854553, 0.9028253555297852, 0.6723353862762451, 0.8398563861846924, 0.8417778015136719, 0.816444456577301, 0.8648666143417358, 0.7534584403038025, 0.9185240864753723, 0.4879351556301117, 0.917924702167511, 0.9052017331123352, 0.8342302441596985, 0.5568476319313049, 0.815792977809906, 0.8451024293899536, 0.859914243221283, 0.8023801445960999, 0.9472709894180298, 0.8536728024482727, 0.9050734639167786, 0.9201967120170593, 0.9424338340759277, 0.8821449279785156, 0.6625601053237915, 0.8299225568771362, 0.8402813076972961, 0.7767698764801025, 0.773393452167511, 0.759768545627594, 0.8155831694602966, 0.7669745683670044, 0.6448982954025269, 0.6207197308540344, 0.7696693539619446, 0.6930037140846252, 0.7779626250267029, 0.8587607741355896, 0.9374488592147827, 0.9095708131790161, 0.7217361330986023, 0.7969861030578613, 0.8439463376998901, 0.8438158631324768, 0.45828917622566223, 0.8057934641838074, 0.789118766784668, 0.6924929618835449, 0.8038538098335266, 0.8609446883201599, 0.7316256761550903, 0.8357227444648743, 0.7887866497039795, 0.8248829245567322, 0.8748748898506165, 0.906799852848053, 0.8975964784622192, 0.8371099829673767, 0.7398313283920288, 0.7693986296653748, 0.924091100692749, 0.8170502781867981, 0.8818073272705078, 0.865246593952179, 0.8448654413223267, 0.8259612917900085, 0.724715530872345, 0.889542281627655, 0.7040529847145081, 0.6788379549980164, 0.716639518737793, 0.861102283000946, 0.7711092829704285, 0.7070053219795227, 0.7751635909080505, 0.79336017370224, 0.9037649035453796, 0.9144555926322937, 0.9538883566856384, 0.5239208340644836, 0.8096817135810852, 0.9380524754524231, 0.905639111995697, 0.8883135914802551, 0.7251114249229431, 0.7763383388519287, 0.7709909081459045, 0.8229222893714905, 0.8252021670341492, 0.9223434329032898, 0.8024045825004578, 0.7670783996582031, 0.5451445579528809, 0.7287972569465637, 0.7048584222793579, 0.9205566048622131, 0.894569993019104, 0.9503032565116882, 0.8792924880981445, 0.9384058117866516, 0.7915943264961243, 0.8661453127861023, 0.8825036287307739, 0.8549157977104187, 0.9402526617050171, 0.6814382672309875, 0.9146090745925903, 0.8171429634094238, 0.9085974097251892, 0.6978153586387634, 0.5654482245445251, 0.7983052134513855, 0.7706271409988403, 0.9100344777107239, 0.46531903743743896, 0.9111257791519165, 0.831366777420044, 0.713108241558075, 0.9589173197746277, 0.888436496257782, 0.8578672409057617, 0.7948889136314392, 0.8733857274055481, 0.8676982522010803, 0.9228792786598206, 0.9098979234695435, 0.8304205536842346, 0.6806249022483826, 0.5417929291725159, 0.6316573023796082, 0.8994415998458862, 0.5852934122085571, 0.7724468111991882, 0.783693790435791, 0.9121886491775513, 0.8241795897483826, 0.8955368995666504, 0.8895256519317627, 0.7434661984443665, 0.8425127863883972, 0.9180036783218384, 0.7212627530097961, 0.8212812542915344, 0.6376031041145325, 0.8787073493003845, 0.7153059840202332, 0.8160503506660461, 0.8833574056625366, 0.9206563234329224, 0.886195719242096, 0.8449592590332031, 0.798374354839325]}